Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646A.578,  as amended by section 12, chapter 369, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
646A.578. (1) A controller shall:
(a) Specify in the privacy notice described in subsection (4)  of this section the express purposes
for which the controller is collecting and processing personal data;
(b) Limit the controller’s collection of personal data to only the personal data that  is adequate,
relevant and reasonably necessary to serve  the purposes the controller specified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection;
(c) Establish, implement and maintain for personal data the same safeguards  described in ORS
646A.622 that are required for protecting personal information, as defined in  ORS 646A.602, such
that the  controller’s safeguards protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of the personal
data to the extent appropriate for the volume and nature of the personal data; and
(d) Provide an effective means by which a consumer may revoke  consent a consumer gave under
ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 to the controller’s processing of the consumer’s  personal data. The means
must be at least as easy as the  means by which the consumer provided consent. Once the consumer
revokes consent, the controller shall cease processing the  personal data as soon as is practicable,
but not later than 15 days after receiving the revocation.
(2) A controller may not:
(a) Process personal data for purposes that are  not reasonably necessary for and compatible
with the purposes the controller specified in subsection (1)(a) of  this section, unless the controller
obtains the consumer’s consent[ ;].
(b) Process sensitive data about a consumer without first obtaining the consumer’s consent or,
if the controller  knows the consumer is a child, without processing the sensitive data in accordance
with the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq. and the  regu-
lations, rules and guidance adopted under the Act, all as in effect on January 1, 2024[ ;].
(c) Process a consumer’s personal data  for the purposes of targeted advertising[ ,] or of profiling
the consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects  or effects of similar significance
[or of selling the consumer’s personal data without the  consumer’s consent ] if the controller has actual
Enrolled House Bill 2008 (HB 2008-B) Page 1
knowledge that, or willfully disregards whether,  the consumer is [ at least 13 years of age and not
older than 15 years of age; or ] under 16 years of age.
(d) Sell personal data that:
(A) Pertains to a  consumer if the controller has actual knowledge that, or willfully dis-
regards whether, the consumer is under 16 years of age; or
(B) Accurately identifies within a  radius of 1,750 feet a consumer’s present or past lo-
cation, or the present or past location of a device that links or is linkable to a consumer by
means of technology that includes, but is not limited to, a  global positioning system that
provides latitude and longitude coordinates, except that personal data that is not subject to
sale under this subparagraph does not include the content  of communications or any data
generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or  equipment
for use by a utility.
[(d)] (e)  Discriminate against a consumer  that exercises a right provided to the consumer under
ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 by means such as denying goods or  services, charging different prices or
rates for goods or services or providing a different level  of quality or selection of goods or services
to the consumer.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not:
(a) Require a controller to provide a good or service that  requires personal data from a con-
sumer that the controller does not collect or maintain; or
(b) Prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level of quality or  selection of
goods or services to a consumer, including an  offer for no fee or charge, in connection with a
consumer’s voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features,  discount or
club card program.
(4) A controller shall provide to consumers a reasonably accessible, clear and meaningful  pri-
vacy notice that:
(a) Lists the categories of personal data, including the categories of sensitive data,  that the
controller processes;
(b) Describes the controller’s purposes for processing the personal data;
(c) Describes how a consumer may  exercise the consumer’s rights under ORS 646A.570 to
646A.589, including how a consumer may appeal a controller’s denial  of a consumer’s request under
ORS 646A.576;
(d) Lists all categories of personal data, including  the categories of sensitive data, that the
controller shares with third parties;
(e) Describes all categories of third parties with which the controller shares personal data at
a level  of detail that enables the consumer to understand what type of entity each third party is and,
to the extent possible, how each third party may process personal data;
(f) Specifies an electronic mail address or other online method by  which a consumer can contact
the controller that the controller actively monitors;
(g) Identifies the controller, including any  business name under which the controller registered
with the Secretary of State and any assumed business name that the controller uses in this state;
(h) Provides a clear and conspicuous description of any  processing of personal data in which the
controller  engages  for the purpose of targeted advertising or for the purpose of profiling the con-
sumer in furtherance  of decisions that produce legal effects or effects of similar significance, and a
procedure by which the consumer may opt out of this type of processing; and
(i) Describes  the method or methods the controller has established for a consumer to submit a
request under ORS 646A.576 (1).
(5) The  method or methods described in subsection (4)(i) of this section for submitting a
consumer’s request to a controller must:
(a) Take into account:
(A) Ways in which consumers normally interact with the controller;
(B) A need for security and reliability in communications related to the request; and
(C) The controller’s ability to authenticate  the identity of the consumer that makes the request;
Enrolled House Bill 2008 (HB 2008-B) Page 2
(b) Provide a clear  and conspicuous link to a webpage where the consumer or an authorized
agent may opt out from a  controller’s processing of the consumer’s personal data as described in
ORS 646A.574 (1)(d) or, solely if the controller does not have a capacity needed for  linking to a
webpage, provide another method the consumer can use to opt out; and
(c) Allow a consumer or  authorized agent to send a signal to the controller that indicates the
consumer’s preference to opt out of the sale of personal data or targeted advertising under ORS
646A.574 (1)(d) by means of a platform, technology or mechanism that:
(A) Does not unfairly disadvantage another controller;
(B) Does not use a default setting but instead  requires the consumer or authorized agent to
make an affirmative, voluntary and unambiguous choice to opt out;
(C) Is consumer friendly and easy for an average consumer to use;
(D) Is as consistent as possible with  similar platforms, technologies or mechanisms required
under federal or state laws or regulations; and
(E) Enables the controller to accurately determine whether the consumer is  a resident of this
state and has made a legitimate request under ORS 646A.576 to opt out as described  in ORS
646A.574 (1)(d).
(6) If a consumer or authorized agent uses a method described in subsection (5)  of this section
to opt out of a controller’s processing of the consumer’s personal data under ORS  646A.574 (1)(d)
and the decision conflicts with a  consumer’s voluntary participation in a bona fide reward, club card
or loyalty program or a program that  provides premium features or discounts in return for the
consumer’s consent to the controller’s processing of the  consumer’s personal data, the controller
may either comply with the request to opt out or notify the consumer of  the conflict and ask the
consumer to affirm that the consumer intends to withdraw from the bona  fide reward, club card or
loyalty program or  the program that provides premium features or discounts. If the consumer affirms
that the consumer intends to withdraw, the controller shall comply with the request to opt out.
Passed by House April 17, 2025
Repassed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2008 (HB 2008-B) Page 3